Washington statutes.
RCW 26.09.902

RCW 26.09.900 and 26.09.901 deemed in effect on July 16, 1973.

The provisions of RCW 26.09.900 and 26.09.901 are remedial and procedural and shall be construed to have been in effect as of July 16, 1973.

[ 1974 ex.s. c 15 s 3.]